Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the profound importance of preserving and nurturing the cultural heritage, traditions, and languages of American Indian and Alaska Native students. It is the intent of this act to support educational opportunities that affirm the identity, history, and contributions of American Indian and Alaska Native communities while fostering academic achievement.The legislature acknowledges that it has intended to promote the full success of the centennial accord, signed by state and tribal government leaders in 1989, and the subsequent millennial accord in 1999. The legislature further recognizes that American Indian and Alaska Native students thrive in educational environments that honor their cultural heritage and provide meaningful connections to their land, language, and traditions. These connections are vital to building resilience, fostering a sense of belonging, and ensuring the success of future generations.The legislature further recognizes that American Indian and Alaska Native students have historically been misidentified and underidentified as a result of federal policies that fail to count American Indian and Alaska Native students who have more than one racial identity. This underidentification is persistent in educational systems for support services, academic opportunities, and cultural programs, and stems from a complex history that includes the forced removal of indigenous cultures, languages, and identities through policies and practices that sought to assimilate Native peoples.Therefore, the legislature intends to enact a state grant program to match the federal investment through the Title VI, Part A, Subpart 1 grant, which provides critical funding to school districts to meet the unique cultural, language, and educational needs of American Indian and Alaska Native students. This grant program aims to empower American Indian and Alaska Native students by supporting culturally relevant programming, enhancing access to resources, and strengthening partnerships between schools and tribal communities.Through this act, the legislature reaffirms its commitment to addressing educational inequities and honoring the sovereignty, identity, and future of American Indian and Alaska Native people in Washington state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) The office of native education created in RCW 28A.300.105 shall administer a state matching grant program to support school districts and state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW.(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award state grants to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools that were eligible for and received funding from the federal Indian education formula grant under Title VI, Part A of the every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95), in the prior school year.(b) To receive a state grant, an eligible school district or state-tribal education compact school must submit a strategic plan to the office of native education for meeting the specific needs of American Indian and Alaska Native students. Plans must include, at minimum:(i) Key goals, measures, and outcomes that the funding will support; and(ii) Data, either qualitative or quantitative, on the above goals, measures, and outcomes.(c) If a school district receives a combined $40,000 or greater from the state grant outlined above and the federal Indian education formula grant, it must engage in tribal consultation as required under Title VI of the federal every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95, Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 10001 et seq., Title 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.). Tribal consultation must include uses of funds from both the federal Indian education formula grant and the state grant.(d) State grant recipients must engage in meaningful parental consultation, in line with requirements under the federal Indian education formula grant.(e) State grant recipients must participate in the office of the superintendent of public instruction professional learning communities organized by the superintendent of public instruction.(2) State grant awards must be based on the latest published grant awards for the federal Indian education formula grant under Title VI, Part A of the every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95).(3) State grant funds under this section may be used to support the education of American Indian and Alaska Native students and may enhance activities under federal grants. Objectives of the state grant include, but are not limited to:(a) Increasing knowledge of cultural identity and awareness, including traditional ecological knowledge;(b) Family engagement and intergenerational knowledge sharing;(c) Increasing academic achievement;(d) Improving school attendance; and(e) Enhancing student and staff engagement.(4) To assist school districts and state-tribal education compact schools accessing federal funding, the superintendent of public instruction shall support the application of the federal Indian education formula grant under Title VI, Part A of the every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95) through technical assistance and guidance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning June 30, 2026, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the state grants awarded under section 2 of this act.(2) This report must include, at minimum:(a) Which school districts and state-tribal education compact schools received a state matching grant;(b) A summary of state grant uses, activities, and outcomes, including information on data that was submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by state grant recipients in their strategic plan; and(c) If applicable, recommendations for state grant adjustments regarding eligibility or funding.--- END ---